Illinois, session 104th, HB5154.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 9-1, 9-1.4, 9-1.5, 9-1.8, 9-1.14, 9-1.15, 9-3, 9-10, 69-22, and 9-28.5 and by adding Sections 9-1.16, 9-1.17, 9-3.7, 79-3.10, 9-10.5, and 9-55 as follows: 8    (10 ILCS 5/9-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 9-1)9    Sec. 9-1. As used in this Article, unless the context 10otherwise requires, the terms defined in Sections 9-1.1 11through 9-1.17 9-1.13, have the respective meanings as defined 12in those Sections.13(Source: P.A. 86-873.) 14    (10 ILCS 5/9-1.4)  (from Ch. 46, par. 9-1.4)15    Sec. 9-1.4. Contribution. 16    (A) "Contribution" means:17    (1) a gift, subscription, donation, dues, loan, advance, 18deposit of money, or anything of value, knowingly received in 19connection with the nomination for election, election, or 20retention of any candidate or person to or in public office or 21in connection with any question of public policy;22    (1.5) a gift, subscription, donation, dues, loan, advance,   HB5154- 2 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1deposit of money, or anything of value that constitutes 2election spending an electioneering communication made in 3concert or cooperation with or at the request, suggestion, or 4knowledge of a candidate, a political committee, or any of 5their agents; 6    (2) the purchase of tickets for fund-raising events, 7including but not limited to dinners, luncheons, cocktail 8parties, and rallies made in connection with the nomination 9for election, election, or retention of any person in or to 10public office, or in connection with any question of public 11policy;12    (3) a transfer of funds received by a political committee 13from another political committee;14    (4) the services of an employee donated by an employer, in 15which case the contribution shall be listed in the name of the 16employer, except that any individual services provided 17voluntarily and without promise or expectation of compensation 18from any source shall not be deemed a contribution; and19    (5) an expenditure by a political committee made in 20cooperation, consultation, or concert with another political 21committee.22    (A-5) "In-kind contribution" means anything of value, 23other than a direct contribution of funds, knowingly received 24in connection with the nomination for election, election, or 25retention of any candidate or person to or in public office or 26in connection with any question of public policy, including:  HB5154- 3 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1        (1) goods or services provided free of charge or at 2    less than their market value; and3        (2) anything of value that constitutes election 4    spending made in concert or cooperation with or at the 5    request, suggestion, or knowledge of a candidate, a 6    political committee, or any of their agents. 7        (B) "Contribution" does not include: 8            (a) the use of real or personal property and the 9        cost of invitations, food, and beverages, voluntarily 10        provided by an individual in rendering voluntary 11        personal services on the individual's residential 12        premises for candidate-related activities; provided 13        the value of the service provided does not exceed an 14        aggregate of $150 in a reporting period; 15            (b) the sale of any food or beverage by a vendor 16        for use in a candidate's campaign at a charge less than 17        the normal comparable charge, if such charge for use 18        in a candidate's campaign is at least equal to the cost 19        of such food or beverage to the vendor;20            (c) communications by a corporation to its 21        stockholders and executive or administrative personnel 22        or their families;23            (d) communications by an association to its 24        members and executive or administrative personnel or 25        their families;26            (e) voter registration or other campaigns   HB5154- 4 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1        encouraging voting that make no mention of any clearly 2        identified candidate, public question, political 3        party, group, or combination thereof;4            (f) a loan of money by a national or State bank or 5        credit union made in accordance with the applicable 6        banking laws and regulations and in the ordinary 7        course of business, but the loan shall be listed on 8        disclosure reports required by this Article; however, 9        the use, ownership, or control of any security for 10        such a loan, if provided by a person other than the 11        candidate or his or her committee, qualifies as a 12        contribution; or13            (g) an independent expenditure. 14        (C) Interest or other investment income, earnings or 15    proceeds, and refunds or returns of all or part of a 16    committee's previous expenditures shall not be considered 17    contributions but shall be listed on disclosure reports 18    required by this Article. 19(Source: P.A. 96-832, eff. 1-1-11.) 20    (10 ILCS 5/9-1.5)  (from Ch. 46, par. 9-1.5)21    Sec. 9-1.5. Expenditure.22    (A) "Expenditure" means: 23        (1) a payment, distribution, purchase, loan, advance, 24    deposit, gift of money, or anything of value, in 25    connection with the nomination for election, election, or   HB5154- 5 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    retention of any person to or in public office or in 2    connection with any question of public policy; 3        (2) a payment, distribution, purchase, loan, advance, 4    deposit, gift of money, or anything of value that 5    constitutes election spending an electioneering 6    communication made in concert or cooperation with or at 7    the request, suggestion, or knowledge of a candidate, a 8    political committee, or any of their agents; or 9        (3) a transfer of funds by a political committee to 10    another political committee. 11    (B) "Expenditure" does not include: 12        (a) the use of real or personal property and the cost 13    of invitations, food, and beverages, voluntarily provided 14    by an individual in rendering voluntary personal services 15    on the individual's residential premises for 16    candidate-related activities; provided the value of the 17    service provided does not exceed an aggregate of $150 in a 18    reporting period; or 19        (b) the sale of any food or beverage by a vendor for 20    use in a candidate's campaign at a charge less than the 21    normal comparable charge, if such charge for use in a 22    candidate's campaign is at least equal to the cost of such 23    food or beverage to the vendor. 24(Source: P.A. 96-832, eff. 1-1-11.) 25    (10 ILCS 5/9-1.8)  (from Ch. 46, par. 9-1.8)  HB5154- 6 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    Sec. 9-1.8. Political committees. 2    (a) "Political committee" includes a candidate political 3committee, a political party committee, a political action 4committee, a ballot initiative committee, and an independent 5expenditure committee.6    (b) "Candidate political committee" means the candidate 7himself or herself or any natural person, trust, partnership, 8corporation, or other organization or group of persons 9designated by the candidate that accepts contributions or 10makes expenditures during any 12-month period in an aggregate 11amount exceeding $5,000 on behalf of the candidate.12    (c) "Political party committee" means the State central 13committee of a political party, a county central committee of 14a political party, a legislative caucus committee, or a 15committee formed by a ward or township committeeperson of a 16political party. For purposes of this Article, a "legislative 17caucus committee" means a committee established for the 18purpose of electing candidates to the General Assembly by the 19person elected President of the Senate, Minority Leader of the 20Senate, Speaker of the House of Representatives, Minority 21Leader of the House of Representatives, or a committee 22established by 5 or more members of the same caucus of the 23Senate or 10 or more members of the same caucus of the House of 24Representatives.25    (d) "Political action committee" means any natural person, 26trust, partnership, committee, association, corporation, or   HB5154- 7 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1other organization or group of persons, other than a 2candidate, political party, candidate political committee, or 3political party committee, that accepts contributions or makes 4expenditures during any 12-month period in an aggregate amount 5exceeding $5,000 on behalf of or in opposition to a candidate 6or candidates for public office and that influences the 7nomination or election of a candidate or candidates as one of 8its major purposes. "Political action committee" includes any 9natural person, trust, partnership, committee, association, 10corporation, or other organization or group of persons, other 11than a candidate, political party, candidate political 12committee, or political party committee, that engages in 13election spending makes electioneering communications during 14any 12-month period in an aggregate amount exceeding $5,000 15related to any candidate or candidates for public office and 16that influences the nomination or election of a candidate or 17candidates as one of its major purposes.18    (e) "Ballot initiative committee" means any natural 19person, trust, partnership, committee, association, 20corporation, or other organization or group of persons that 21accepts contributions or makes expenditures during any 2212-month period in an aggregate amount exceeding $5,000 in 23support of or in opposition to any question of public policy to 24be submitted to the electors and that influences the 25initiation or approval of a question of public policy to be 26submitted to the electors as one of its major purposes.   HB5154- 8 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1"Ballot initiative committee" includes any natural person, 2trust, partnership, committee, association, corporation, or 3other organization or group of persons that engages in 4election spending makes electioneering communications during 5any 12-month period in an aggregate amount exceeding $5,000 6related to any question of public policy to be submitted to the 7voters and that influences the initiation or approval of a 8question of public policy to be submitted to the electors as 9one of its major purposes. The $5,000 threshold applies to any 10contributions or expenditures received or made with the 11purpose of securing a place on the ballot for, advocating the 12defeat or passage of, or engaging in election spending 13electioneering communication regarding the question of public 14policy, regardless of the method of initiation of the question 15of public policy and regardless of whether petitions have been 16circulated or filed with the appropriate office or whether the 17question has been adopted and certified by the governing body. 18    (f) "Independent expenditure committee" means any trust, 19partnership, committee, association, corporation, or other 20organization or group of persons that: 21        (1) makes independent expenditures during any 12-month 22    period in an aggregate amount exceeding $5,000;23        (2) has as one of its major purposes influencing the 24    nomination or election of a candidate or candidates; and25        (3) does not do any of the following:26            (A) make contributions to any political committee   HB5154- 9 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1        other than a ballot initiative committee or another 2        independent expenditure committee;3            (B) coordinate fundraising with any candidate or 4        another political committee, other than a ballot 5        initiative committee or another independent 6        expenditure committee;7            (C) coordinate fundraising or spending with any 8        group established, financed, maintained, or controlled 9        by a candidate or another political committee, other 10        than a ballot initiative committee or another 11        independent expenditure committee; or12            (D) employ the services of a person that during 13        the previous 2 years had provided campaign services 14        for a public official or candidate whom the trust, 15        partnership, committee, association, corporation, or 16        other organization or group supports, unless the 17        person establishes an effective firewall as described 18        in subsection (f) of Section 9-1.17.19    As used in this subsection, "coordinate" means to make in 20cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request 21or suggestion of, a candidate, a candidate's committee, or a 22political party committee. 23    formed for the exclusive purpose of making independent 24expenditures during any 12-month period in an aggregate amount 25exceeding $5,000 in support of or in opposition to (i) the 26nomination for election, election, retention, or defeat of any   HB5154- 10 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1public official or candidate or (ii) any question of public 2policy to be submitted to the electors. "Independent 3expenditure committee" also includes any trust, partnership, 4committee, association, corporation, or other organization or 5group of persons that makes electioneering communications that 6are not made in connection, consultation, or concert with or 7at the request or suggestion of a public official or 8candidate, a public official's or candidate's designated 9political committee or campaign, or an agent or agents of the 10public official, candidate, or political committee or campaign 11during any 12-month period in an aggregate amount exceeding 12$5,000 related to (i) the nomination for election, election, 13retention, or defeat of any public official or candidate or 14(ii) any question of public policy to be submitted to the 15voters.16    (g) "Limited activity committee" means a political 17committee for which a person who is nominated to a position 18that is subject to confirmation by the Senate, including a 19member of the State Board of Elections, is either an officer or 20a candidate the committee has designated to support. 21(Source: P.A. 102-664, eff. 1-1-22.) 22    (10 ILCS 5/9-1.14)23    Sec. 9-1.14. Electioneering communication and public 24communication. 25    (a) "Electioneering communication" means, for the purposes   HB5154- 11 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1of this Article, any broadcast, cable, or satellite 2communication, including radio, television, or Internet 3communication, that (1) refers to (i) a clearly identified 4candidate or candidates who will appear on the ballot for 5nomination for election, election, or retention, (ii) a 6clearly identified political party, or (iii) a clearly 7identified question of public policy that will appear on the 8ballot, (2) is made within (i) 60 days before a general 9election or consolidated election or (ii) 30 days before a 10primary election, (3) is targeted to the relevant electorate, 11and (4) is susceptible to no reasonable interpretation other 12than as an appeal to vote for or against a clearly identified 13candidate for nomination for election, election, or retention, 14a political party, or a question of public policy.15    (b) "Electioneering communication" does not include:16        (1) A communication, other than an advertisement, 17    appearing in a news story, commentary, or editorial 18    distributed through the facilities of any legitimate news 19    organization, unless the facilities are owned or 20    controlled by any political party, political committee, or 21    candidate.22        (2) A communication made solely to promote a 23    nonpartisan candidate debate or forum that is made by or 24    on behalf of the person sponsoring the debate or forum. 25        (3) A communication made as part of a nonpartisan 26    non-partisan activity designed to encourage individuals to   HB5154- 12 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    vote or to register to vote.2        (4) A communication by an organization operating and 3    remaining in good standing under Section 501(c)(3) of the 4    Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 5        (5) A communication exclusively between a labor 6    organization, as defined under federal or State law, and 7    its members. 8        (6) A communication exclusively between an 9    organization formed under Section 501(c)(6) of the 10    Internal Revenue Code and its members.11     (c) "Public communication" means, for the purposes of 12this Article, any broadcast, cable, satellite, radio, 13television, print, or Internet communication, or any other 14form of general public political advertising or marketing 15regardless of medium, including, but not limited to:16        (1) advertising placed for a fee in a print 17    publication or on a website or other digital medium;18        (2) outdoor advertising, such as billboards; or19        (3) mass mailing, phone banking, or text banking 20    delivering an identical or substantially similar message 21    intended to contact 500 or more persons within a 30-day 22    period. 23(Source: P.A. 96-832, eff. 7-1-10.) 24    (10 ILCS 5/9-1.15)25    Sec. 9-1.15. Independent expenditure.   HB5154- 13 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    (a) "Independent expenditure" means any payment, gift, 2donation, or expenditure of funds that:3        (1) is made for election spending; and4        (2) is not made in connection, consultation, or 5    concert with or at the request or suggestion of a public 6    official or candidate, the public official or candidate's 7    political committee, or the agent or agents of the public 8    official, candidate, or political committee or campaign.9    (b) An independent expenditure is not considered a 10contribution to a political committee. An expenditure made by 11a person or political committee in connection, consultation, 12or concert with or at the request or suggestion of the public 13official or candidate, the public official's or candidate's 14political committee, or the agent or agents of the public 15official, candidate, or political committee or campaign shall 16be considered a contribution to the public official's or 17candidate's political committee.18    (c) A person that is not a political committee and that 19makes an independent expenditure that, alone or in combination 20with any other independent expenditure made by that person 21during any 12-month period, equals an aggregate value of at 22least $5,000 shall file a written disclosure with the State 23Board of Elections within 2 business days after making any 24expenditure that results in the person meeting or exceeding 25the $5,000 threshold. A person who has made a written 26disclosure with the State Board of Elections shall have a   HB5154- 14 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1continuing obligation to report further expenditures, in 2$1,000 increments, to the State Board of Elections until the 3conclusion of the next general election.4    (d) A person that makes an independent expenditure 5supporting or opposing a public official or candidate that, 6alone or in combination with any other independent expenditure 7made by that person supporting or opposing that public 8official or candidate during the election cycle, equals an 9aggregate value of more than (i) $250,000 for statewide office 10or (ii) $100,000 for all other elective offices shall file a 11written disclosure with the State Board of Elections within 2 12business days after making any expenditure that results in the 13person exceeding the applicable threshold. Each disclosure 14shall identify the person, the public official, or candidate 15supported or opposed, the date, amount, and nature of each 16independent expenditure, and the person's occupation and 17employer, if applicable.18    (e) Every political committee that makes independent 19expenditures shall report all the independent expenditures as 20required under Section 9-10.21    (f) If a political committee organized as an independent 22expenditure committee makes a contribution to any other 23political committee other than another independent expenditure 24committee or a ballot initiative committee, the State Board of 25Elections shall assess a fine equal to the amount of any 26contribution received in the preceding 2 years by the   HB5154- 15 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1independent expenditure committee that exceeded the limits for 2a political action committee set forth in subsection (d) of 3Section 9-8.5. 4"Independent expenditure" means any payment, gift, donation, 5or expenditure of funds (i) by a natural person or political 6committee for the purpose of making electioneering 7communications or of expressly advocating for or against the 8nomination for election, election, retention, or defeat of a 9clearly identifiable public official or candidate or for or 10against any question of public policy to be submitted to the 11voters and (ii) that is not made in connection, consultation, 12or concert with or at the request or suggestion of the public 13official or candidate, the public official's or candidate's 14designated political committee or campaign, or the agent or 15agents of the public official, candidate, or political 16committee or campaign.17(Source: P.A. 96-832, eff. 7-1-10; 97-766, eff. 7-6-12.) 18    (10 ILCS 5/9-1.16 new)19    Sec. 9-1.16. Election spending. "Election spending" means 20any spending on:21        (1) express advocacy for or against the nomination for 22    election, election, retention, or defeat of a clearly 23    identifiable public official or candidate or for or 24    against any question of public policy to be submitted to 25    the voters;   HB5154- 16 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1        (2) an electioneering communication; 2        (3) a public communication that promotes, attacks, 3    supports, or opposes a clearly identifiable public 4    official or candidate or any question of public policy to 5    be submitted to the voters; 6        (4) encouraging partisan voter activity, including 7    partisan voter registration, partisan get-out-the-vote 8    activity, or partisan generic campaign activity; or 9        (5) conducting research, design, production, polling, 10    data analytics, mailing or social media list acquisition, 11    or other activities conducted in preparation for or 12    conjunction with activities in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), 13    and (4).  14    (10 ILCS 5/9-1.17 new)15    Sec. 9-1.17. Coordinated expenditures.16    (a) "Coordinated expenditure" means: 17        (1) the republication of a candidate's or political 18    party's campaign materials, unless the republication is 19    used to oppose the candidate or party that created the 20    materials; or 21        (2) an expenditure, regardless of whether it meets at 22    least one conduct standard, that is materially consistent 23    with instructions, directions, or suggestions from a 24    candidate or political concerning the making of 25    expenditures, regardless of whether the instructions,   HB5154- 17 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    directions, or suggestions are publicly available, as 2    determined by the State Board of Elections using factors 3    that include, but are not limited to:4            (A) noticeable placement of instructions, 5        directions or suggestions, such as on a discrete web 6        page or portion of a web page containing one or more 7        other factors identified in this paragraph;8            (B) whether the instructions, directions, or 9        suggestions include language indicating that 10        information should be communicated to others, such as 11        the phrase "voters need to know";12            (C) whether the instructions, directions, or 13        suggestions include targeted audience information, 14        such as specific demographics or the location of 15        intended or suggested recipients; and16            (D) whether the instructions, directions, or 17        suggestions include suggested methods of 18        communication, such as indicating that recipients need 19        to see, hear, or see on the go; or20        (2) an expenditure that meets at least one conduct 21    standard and one content standard. 22    (b) "Coordinated expenditure" does not include: 23        (1) a communication that appears in a news story, 24    commentary, or editorial; or 25        (2) an expenditure for a nonpartisan candidate debate 26    or forum.   HB5154- 18 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    (c) For purposes of defining coordinated expenditures: 2        (1) "candidate" includes any person who is a candidate 3    at the time of the expenditure, regardless of whether that 4    person was a candidate at the time the conduct 5    constituting coordination took place; 6        (2) an expenditure "not made totally independently" 7    includes any expenditure made under any expressed or 8    implied agreement with, or any general or particular 9    understanding with, or pursuant to any request by or 10    communication with, the candidate, committee, or political 11    party about the expenditure; and 12        (3) references to candidates or parties include 13    agents, executives, or managers who worked for the persons 14    during the 2 years preceding the expenditure. 15    (d) Conduct constitutes coordination between a spender and 16the candidate or political party that benefits from the 17expenditure whenever: 18        (1) an expenditure is not made totally independently 19    of a candidate or party; 20        (2) during the 2 years preceding the expenditure, the 21    candidate, including immediate family members, or party 22    directly or indirectly established, maintained, 23    controlled, or principally funded the spender; 24        (3) during the 2 years preceding the expenditure, a 25    candidate or party official solicited funds for the 26    spender, provided fundraising information to the spender,   HB5154- 19 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    appeared as a speaker at a fundraiser for the spender, or 2    gave permission to be featured in the spender's 3    fundraising efforts; 4        (4) the expenditure is based on information about the 5    candidate's or party's campaign needs that the candidate 6    or party provided to the spender; or 7        (5) during the 2 years preceding the expenditure, the 8    spender employed the services of a person who, during the 9    same period, had executive or managerial authority for the 10    candidate or party, was authorized to raise or expend 11    funds for the candidate or party, or provided the 12    candidate or party with professional services other than 13    accounting or legal services related to campaign or 14    fundraising strategy. 15    (e) An expenditure, when coordinated, constitutes funds 16spent for the purpose of influencing an election whenever: 17        (1) regarding a candidate or a candidate's political 18    committee, the expenditure is for: 19            (A) a public communication that expressly 20        advocates for or against the nomination or election of 21        a candidate; that supports a candidate's election or 22        opposes a candidate's opponent; or refers to a clearly 23        identified candidate at any time from 120 days before 24        a primary election, nominating caucus or convention, 25        or retention election through the general election; 26            (B) an expenditure for partisan voter activity,   HB5154- 20 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1        including voter registration, get-out-the-vote 2        activity, phone banking, or generic campaign activity, 3        in the jurisdiction where the candidate is seeking 4        election; or 5            (C) an expenditure for research, design or 6        production costs, polling expenses, data analytics, 7        creating or purchasing mailing or social media lists, 8        or other activities related to those defined in 9        subparagraphs (A) or (B). 10        (2) regarding a political party, the expenditure is 11    for: 12            (A) a public communication that expressly 13        advocates for the election of a candidate of the 14        political party or against a candidate of an opposing 15        political party; that supports a candidate of the 16        political party or opposes a candidate of an opposing 17        political party, including generically advocating for 18        the political party or against an opposing political 19        party; or refers to a clearly identified candidate or 20        political party at any time from 120 days before a 21        primary election, nominating caucus or convention, or 22        retention election through the general election; 23            (B) an expenditure for partisan voter activity, 24        including voter registration, get-out-the-vote 25        activity, phone banking, or generic campaign activity; 26        or   HB5154- 21 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1            (C) an expenditure for research, design or 2        production costs, polling expenses, data analytics, 3        creating or purchasing mailing or social media lists, 4        or other activities related to those defined in 5        subparagraphs (A) or (B). 6    (f) Notwithstanding paragraph (5) of subsection (d), 7expenditures involving former employees or common agents of a 8candidate or party will not be deemed coordinated if the 9spender implements, or causes another person to implement, an 10effective firewall. A person who relies upon a firewall bears 11the burden of proof of showing that the firewall was 12effective. A firewall shall: 13        (1) separate staff who provide a service to the 14    spender in relation to its covered expenditures from other 15    staff who provide services to a candidate or party 16    supported by the spender's expenditures; 17        (2) forbid an organization's owners, executives, 18    managers, and supervisors from simultaneously overseeing 19    the work of staff separated by a firewall; 20        (3) prohibit the flow of strategic nonpublic 21    information between the spender and the candidate or party 22    supported by the covered expenditure and between specific 23    staff who are separated by the firewall; 24        (4) provide for physical and technological separation 25    to ensure that strategic nonpublic information does not 26    flow between the spender and the candidate or party and   HB5154- 22 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    between the specific staff separated by the firewall; and 2        (5) be in written form and distributed to all relevant 3    employees and consultants before any relevant work is 4    performed regarding both the general firewall policy and 5    any specific firewall created under the general firewall 6    policy, and provided to the State Board of Elections upon 7    request.  8    (10 ILCS 5/9-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 9-3)9    Sec. 9-3. Political committee statement of organization. 10    (a) Every political committee shall file with the State 11Board of Elections a statement of organization within 10 12business days of the creation of such committee, except any 13political committee created within the 30 days before an 14election shall file a statement of organization within 2 15business days in person, by facsimile transmission, or by 16electronic mail. Any change in information previously 17submitted in a statement of organization shall be reported, as 18required for the original statement of organization by this 19Section, within 10 days following that change. The Board shall 20impose a civil penalty of $50 per business day upon political 21committees for failing to file or late filing of a statement of 22organization. Such penalties shall not exceed $5,000, and 23shall not exceed $10,000 for statewide office political 24committees. There shall be no fine if the statement is mailed 25and postmarked at least 72 hours prior to the filing deadline.   HB5154- 23 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    In addition to the civil penalties authorized by this 2Section, the State Board of Elections or any other political 3committee may apply to the circuit court for a temporary 4restraining order or a preliminary or permanent injunction 5against the political committee to cease the expenditure of 6funds and to cease operations until the statement of 7organization is filed.8    For the purpose of this Section, "statewide office" means 9the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, 10Attorney General, State Treasurer, and State Comptroller. 11    (b) The statement of organization shall include:12        (1) the name and address of the political committee 13    and the designation required by Section 9-2;14        (2) the scope, area of activity, party affiliation, 15    and purposes of the political committee;16        (3) the name, address, and position of each custodian 17    of the committee's books and accounts;18        (4) the name, address, and position of the committee's 19    principal officers, including the chairman, treasurer, and 20    officers and members of its finance committee, if any;21        (5) (blank);22        (6) a statement of what specific disposition of 23    residual fund will be made in the event of the dissolution 24    or termination of the committee;25        (7) a listing of all banks or other financial 26    institutions, safety deposit boxes, and any other   HB5154- 24 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    repositories or custodians of funds used by the committee; 2    and3        (8) the amount of funds available for campaign 4    expenditures as of the filing date of the committee's 5    statement of organization. 6    (c) Each statement of organization required to be filed in 7accordance with this Section shall be verified, dated, and 8signed by either the treasurer of the political committee 9making the statement or the candidate on whose behalf the 10statement is made and shall contain substantially the 11following verification:12"VERIFICATION: 13    I declare that this statement of organization (including 14any accompanying schedules and statements) has been examined 15by me and, to the best of my knowledge and belief, is a true, 16correct, and complete statement of organization as required by 17Article 9 of the Election Code. I understand that willfully 18filing a false or incomplete statement is subject to a civil 19penalty of at least $1,001 and up to $5,000. 20................  .......................................... 21(date of filing) (signature of person making the statement)". 22    (d) The statement of organization for a ballot initiative 23committee also shall include a verification signed by the 24chairperson of the committee that (i) the committee is formed 25for the purpose of supporting or opposing a question of public 26policy, (ii) all contributions received and expenditures made   HB5154- 25 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1by of the committee will be used for the purpose described in 2the statement of organization, (iii) the committee may accept 3unlimited contributions from any source, provided that the 4ballot initiative committee does not make contributions or 5expenditures in support of or opposition to a candidate or 6candidates for nomination for election, election, or 7retention, and (iv) failure to abide by these requirements 8shall deem the committee in violation of this Article.9    (d-5) The statement of organization for an independent 10expenditure committee also shall include a verification signed 11by the chairperson of the committee that (i) the committee is 12formed for the exclusive purpose of making independent 13expenditures, (ii) all contributions received and expenditures 14made by of the committee will be used for the purpose described 15in the statement of organization, (iii) the committee may 16accept unlimited contributions from any source, provided that 17the independent expenditure committee does not make 18contributions to any candidate political committee, political 19party committee, or political action committee, and (iv) 20failure to abide by these requirements shall deem the 21committee in violation of this Article. 22    (e) For purposes of implementing the changes made by this 23amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, every political 24committee in existence on the effective date of this 25amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly shall file the 26statement required by this Section with the Board by December   HB5154- 26 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b131, 2010. 2(Source: P.A. 103-467, eff. 8-4-23.) 3    (10 ILCS 5/9-3.7 new)4    Sec. 9-3.7. Transfer records for independent expenditures. 5    (a) For the purposes of this Article:6    "Business income" means:7        (1) funds received by a person in commercial 8    transactions in the ordinary course of a person's regular 9    trade, business, or investments; or10        (2) membership or union dues to the extent that they 11    do not exceed $5,000 from a person in a calendar year.12    "Covered entity" means any person, including a natural 13person or political committee, who spends $10,000 or more in 14an election cycle on independent expenditures, or who accepts 15$10,000 or more in an election cycle of in-kind contributions 16to enable independent expenditures, but does not include:17        (1) individuals who spend only their own personal 18    funds for independent expenditures;19        (2) organizations that spend only their own business 20    income for independent expenditures;21        (3) any political committee, other than a candidate 22    political committee or a political party committee, that 23    receives no more than $12,000 in contributions from any 24    one person in a calendar year; and25        (4) any candidate political committee or political   HB5154- 27 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    party committee.2    "Identity" means:3        (1) in the case of a natural person, the name, mailing 4    address, occupation, and employer of the individual; and5        (2) in the case of any other entity, the full name and 6    address, federal tax status, and state of incorporation or 7    partnership, if any, of the entity.8    "Original funds" means business income or the personal 9funds of an individual.10    "Personal funds" means:11        (1) any asset of an individual that the individual has 12    legal control over and rightful title to; and13        (2) income received by an individual, including salary 14    and other earned income from bona fide employment, 15    dividends and proceeds from the individual's personal 16    investments, bequests to the individual, including income 17    from trusts established by bequests, and a portion of 18    assets that are jointly owned by the individual and the 19    individual's spouse equal to the individual's share of the 20    asset under the instrument of conveyance or ownership, but 21    if no specific share is indicated by an instrument of 22    conveyance or ownership, the value of one-half of the 23    property.24    "Personal funds" does not mean any asset or income 25received from any person for the purpose of influencing any 26election.  HB5154- 28 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    "Traceable funds" means funds that have been given to a 2covered entity and for which no donor has opted out of their 3use or transfer for independent expenditures or funds used to 4finance in-kind contributions to a covered entity to enable 5independent expenditures.6    "Transfer records" means a written record of the identity 7of the persons who directly or indirectly contributed or 8transferred original funds used for independent expenditures, 9the amounts of those contributions or transfers, and how the 10funds are disbursed.11    (b) A covered entity that spends $10,000 or more on 12independent expenditures in the 12 months prior to an 13election, or who accepts $10,000 or more in an election cycle 14of in-kind contributions to enable independent expenditures, 15shall maintain transfer records. For the purposes of this 16Article, the amount of a covered entity's expenditures 17includes independent expenditures made by entities 18established, financed, maintained, or controlled by that 19committee or its officers.20    (c) Before a covered entity can use or transfer a donor's 21funds for independent expenditures, the donor shall be 22notified in writing that the funds may be so used and shall be 23given an opportunity to opt out of having the donation used or 24transferred for the spending. The notice under this subsection 25shall:26        (1) inform donors that their contributions may be used   HB5154- 29 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    for independent expenditures in Illinois and that 2    information about donors may have to be reported to the 3    State Board of Elections for disclosure to the public; and4        (2) inform donors that they can opt out of having 5    their contributions used or transferred for independent 6    expenditures in Illinois by so notifying the covered 7    entity in writing within 21 days.8    The notice required under this subsection may be provided 9to the donor before or after the covered entity receives the 10contribution, but the contribution may not be used or 11transferred for independent expenditures until 21 days after 12the notice is provided or until the donor provides written 13consent, whichever is earlier.14    (d) Any person who contributes $10,000 or more in 15aggregate in traceable funds in an election cycle to a covered 16entity shall inform that entity, within 10 days after 17receiving a written request from the covered entity, of the 18identities of persons who directly or indirectly contributed 19$1,000 or more in original funds being transferred, the 20amounts of the persons' original funds being transferred, and 21any persons who have previously transferred the original 22funds. If more than one transfer has previously occurred, the 23contributor shall disclose all previous transfers and 24intermediaries. The contributor shall maintain these records 25for at least 5 years and provide them, upon request, to the 26State Board of Elections.  HB5154- 30 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    (e) Any person who makes an in-kind contribution to a 2covered entity of $10,000 or more in an election cycle to 3enable independent expenditures shall inform that person, at 4the time the in-kind contribution is made or promised to be 5made, of the identities of persons who directly or indirectly 6contributed or provided $1,000 or more in original funds used 7to finance the in-kind contribution, the amounts of the 8persons' original funds so used, and any persons who had 9previously transferred original funds. If more than one 10transfer had previously occurred, the in-kind contributor 11shall disclose all previous transfers and intermediaries. The 12in-kind contributor shall maintain these records for at least 135 years and provide them, upon request, to the State Board of 14Elections.15    (f) A candidate political committee or a political party 16committee that accepts more than an aggregate of $12,000 in 17contributions from any one person in a calendar year shall:18        (1) inform the contributors that their contributions 19    may be used for election spending in Illinois and that 20    information about them will be reported to the State Board 21    of Elections for disclosure to the public;22        (2) inform the contributors that they shall provide to 23    the committee, within 10 days making contributions that 24    exceed an aggregate of $12,000 in a calendar year, the 25    identities of persons who directly or indirectly 26    contributed or provided $1,000 or more in original funds   HB5154- 31 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    being transferred to the committee, the amounts of the 2    persons' original funds so transferred, and any persons 3    who had previously transferred original funds. If more 4    than one transfer had previously occurred, the contributor 5    shall disclose all previous transfers and intermediaries; 6    and7        (3) include the information provided by the 8    contributors in the committee's reports disclosing 9    contributions, including regular quarterly reports and 10    reports on contributions of $1,000 or more as required 11    under subsection (c) of Section 9-10.12    (g) A contributor who receives the notice provided in 13subsection (f) shall provide to the notifying committee the 14information specified in paragraph (2) subsection (f) within 1510 days after making contributions that exceed an aggregate of 16$12,000 in a calendar year. The contributor shall maintain 17records of this information for at least 5 years and provide 18them, upon request, to the State Board of Elections. 19    (10 ILCS 5/9-3.10 new)20    Sec. 9-3.10. Additional reporting requirements for 21entities making independent expenditures. 22    (a) A covered entity that is also a political committee 23registered with the State Board of Elections shall, in 24addition to the reporting requirements set forth elsewhere in 25this Article, include the following information on reports   HB5154- 32 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1that it makes to the State Board of Elections:2        (1) on the committee statement of organization:3            (A) the identity of any affiliated person who 4        maintains its own transfer records and that person's 5        relationship to the covered entity;6            (B) the name, address, and position of the 7        individual who is the custodian of the transfer 8        records;9        (2) on reports disclosing contributions, including 10    regular quarterly reports and reports on contributions of 11    $1,000 or more as required under subsection (c):12            (A) each contributor of original funds who has 13        contributed, directly or indirectly, more than $5,000 14        of traceable funds or in-kind contributions during the 15        election cycle to the covered entity, and the date and 16        amount of each of the contributor's contributions;17            (B) the identity of persons who acted as 18        intermediaries who transferred, in whole or part, 19        traceable funds from original sources to the covered 20        entity, and the date, amount, and source (original and 21        intermediate) of the transferred funds;22            (C) the identity of each person who received from 23        the covered entity disbursements aggregating to $1,000 24        or more of traceable funds during the election cycle 25        and the date and purpose of each disbursement, 26        including the full name and office sought of any   HB5154- 33 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1        candidate that was supported, opposed, or referenced 2        in a public communication that was financed, in whole 3        or part, with the disbursement; and4            (D) the identity of any person whose aggregate 5        contributions of traceable funds to the covered entity 6        constituted more than half of the funds of the covered 7        entity at the start of the election cycle.8    (b) A covered entity that is not a political committee 9shall file the following reports with the State Board of 10Elections as follows:11        (1) within 10 days after first disbursing $10,000 or 12    more in aggregate during an election cycle on independent 13    expenditures, or accepting $10,000 or more in aggregate 14    during an election cycle of in-kind contributions to 15    enable independent expenditures, the covered entity shall 16    file an initial report that discloses:17            (A) the identity of the person who owns or 18        controls the traceable funds;19            (B) the identity of any affiliated person who 20        maintains its own transfer records and that person's 21        relationship to the covered entity;22            (C) the name, address, and position of the 23        individual who is the custodian of the transfer 24        records;25            (D) the name, address, and position of at least 26        one individual who can control, directly or   HB5154- 34 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1        indirectly, how the traceable funds are disbursed;2            (E) the total amount of traceable funds owned or 3        controlled by the covered entity on the date of the 4        report;5            (F) each contributor of original funds who has 6        contributed, directly or indirectly, more than $5,000 7        of traceable funds or in-kind contributions during the 8        election cycle to the covered entity, and the date and 9        amount of each of the contributor's contributions;10            (G) the identity of persons who acted as 11        intermediaries who transferred, in whole or part, 12        traceable funds from original sources to the covered 13        entity, and the date, amount, and source (original and 14        intermediate) of the transferred funds;15            (H) the identity of each person who received from 16        the covered entity disbursements aggregating to $1,000 17        or more of traceable funds during the election cycle 18        and the date and purpose of each disbursement, 19        including the full name and office sought of any 20        candidate that was supported, opposed, or referenced 21        in a public communication that was financed, in whole 22        or part, with the disbursement; and23            (I) the identity of any person whose aggregate 24        contributions of traceable funds to the covered entity 25        constituted more than half of the funds of the covered 26        entity at the start of the election cycle;  HB5154- 35 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1        (2) after its initial report and each time the covered 2    entity disburses another $10,000 or more in aggregate 3    during the election cycle on independent expenditures, or 4    receives another $10,000 in aggregate during the election 5    cycle of in-kind contributions to enable independent 6    expenditures, the covered entity shall file an additional 7    report within 10 days that shall disclose any information 8    that has changed since it was previously reported under 9    paragraph (1); and10        (3) when information has changed since it was 11    previously reported under paragraph (1) but has not yet 12    been reported, the changed information shall be reported 13    within 20 days, except the reporting person need not 14    report the changes that occur more than 2 years after the 15    most recent report under this Section was filed. 16    (10 ILCS 5/9-10)  (from Ch. 46, par. 9-10)17    Sec. 9-10. Disclosure of contributions and expenditures. 18    (a) The treasurer of every political committee shall file 19with the Board reports of campaign contributions and 20expenditures as required by this Section on forms to be 21prescribed or approved by the Board. 22    (b) Every political committee shall file quarterly reports 23of campaign contributions, expenditures, and independent 24expenditures. The reports shall cover the period January 1 25through March 31, April 1 through June 30, July 1 through   HB5154- 36 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1September 30, and October 1 through December 31 of each year. A 2political committee shall file quarterly reports no later than 3the 15th day of the month following each period. Reports of 4contributions and expenditures must be filed to cover the 5prescribed time periods even though no contributions or 6expenditures may have been received or made during the period. 7A report is considered timely filed if it is received by the 8Board no later than 11:59 p.m. on the deadline or postmarked no 9later than 3 days prior to the deadline.10    (c) A political committee shall file a report of any 11contribution of $1,000 or more electronically with the Board 12within 5 business days after receipt of the contribution, 13except that the report shall be filed within 2 business days 14after receipt if (i) the contribution is received 30 or fewer 15days before the date of an election and (ii) the political 16committee supports or opposes a candidate or public question 17on the ballot at that election or makes expenditures in excess 18of $500 on behalf of or in opposition to a candidate, 19candidates, a public question, or public questions on the 20ballot at that election. The State Board shall allow filings 21of reports of contributions of $1,000 or more by political 22committees that are not required to file electronically to be 23made by facsimile transmission. It is not a violation of this 24subsection (c) and a political committee does not need to file 25a report of a contribution of $1,000 or more if the 26contribution is received and returned within the same period   HB5154- 37 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1it is required to be disclosed on a quarterly report.2    (d) For the purpose of this Section, a contribution is 3considered received on the date (i) a monetary contribution 4was deposited in a bank, financial institution, or other 5repository of funds for the committee, (ii) the date a 6committee receives notice a monetary contribution was 7deposited by an entity used to process financial transactions 8by credit card or other entity used for processing a monetary 9contribution that was deposited in a bank, financial 10institution, or other repository of funds for the committee, 11or (iii) the public official, candidate, or political 12committee receives the notification of contribution of goods 13or services as required under subsection (b) of Section 9-6.14    (e) A political committee that makes independent 15expenditures of $1,000 or more shall file a report 16electronically with the Board within 5 business days after 17making the independent expenditure, except that the report 18shall be filed within 2 business days after making the 19independent expenditure during the 60-day period before an 20election. 21    (e-5) An independent expenditure committee that makes an 22independent expenditure supporting or opposing a public 23official or candidate that, alone or in combination with any 24other independent expenditure made by that independent 25expenditure committee supporting or opposing that public 26official or candidate during the election cycle, equals an   HB5154- 38 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1aggregate value of more than (i) $250,000 for statewide office 2or (ii) $100,000 for all other elective offices must file a 3written disclosure with the State Board of Elections within 2 4business days after making any expenditure that results in the 5independent expenditure committee exceeding the applicable 6threshold. 7    (f) A copy of each report or statement filed under this 8Article shall be preserved by the person filing it for a period 9of two years from the date of filing. 10    (g) The Board may assess a civil penalty against a 11committee or covered entity for any violation of this Section 12or Sections 9-3.5, 9-3.10, or 9-10.5. The Board shall provide 13notice of any violation no later than 5 years 365 days after 14the date of the violation and provide the committee or covered 15entity with an opportunity to appeal a violation. A committee 16or covered entity shall not be fined if notice is not provided 17as required by this subsection. The fine assessed by the Board 18for a violation of this Section shall not be less than the 19amount contributed or undisclosed, and not more than the 20greater of double that amount or $10,000 exceed the amount of 21the contribution and may be no more than $500 for the first 22violation, no more than $1,000 for the second violation, no 23more than $2,000 for a third violation, and no more than $3,000 24for any subsequent violations. When determining the amount of 25the fine whether to waive or reduce a fine, the Board shall 26consider: (1) whether the political committee or covered   HB5154- 39 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1entity made an attempt to disclose the contribution and any 2attempts made to correct the violation; (2) whether the 3violation was inadvertent, knowingly, or intentional; (3) 4whether the violation is attributed to a clerical or computer 5error; (4) the amount of the contribution or total 6contributions in the report; (5) whether the violation arose 7from a discrepancy between the date the contribution was 8reported and the date the contribution was received by a 9political committee or covered entity; (6) the number of days 10the report was submitted late; and (7) any prior violations. 11(Source: P.A. 102-668, eff. 11-15-21.) 12    (10 ILCS 5/9-10.5 new)13    Sec. 9-10.5. Disclosure of original contributors on 14independent expenditures for public communications. 15    (a) Independent expenditures for public communications 16financed by covered entities, including in-kind contributions 17of communications accepted by covered entities, shall include 18the following information:19        (1) Visual public communications. Any public 20    communication that has a visual component shall clearly 21    and conspicuously display the names of the top 3 donors 22    who directly or indirectly donated $10,000 or more during 23    the election cycle to the covered entity. This disclaimer 24    shall include the following written statement: "(3 25    persons) are the top (3) donors who helped pay for this   HB5154- 40 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1    message".2        (2) Audio public communications. Any public 3    communication that has an audio component shall clearly 4    and conspicuously state the names of the top 3 donors who 5    directly or indirectly donated $10,000 or more during the 6    election cycle to the covered entities. This disclaimer 7    shall include the following audio statement: "(3 persons) 8    are the top (3) donors who helped pay for this message."9    (b) The top 3 donors shall be determined by calculating 10the 3 donors of traceable funds that have contributed the most 11original funds, directly or indirectly, during the election 12cycle to the covered entities.13    (c) For purposes of this Section, contributions of 14traceable funds made in prior election cycles shall be 15considered to have been contributed in the current election 16cycle if the contributor's aggregate contributions of original 17funds to the covered entities constituted more than half of 18the person's traceable funds at the start of the election 19cycle.20    (d) If multiple contributors have contributed identical 21amounts such that there is no difference in contributed 22amounts between the third-highest contributor and the 23fourth-highest or lower, the contributor who most recently 24contributed to the covered entity shall be deemed a top 3 25donor.26    (e) No contributor of traceable funds shall be deemed a   HB5154- 41 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1top 3 donor if its aggregate contributions of original funds 2during the election cycle to the covered entity are less than 3$10,000.4    (f) If no person meets the $10,000 threshold in subsection 5(e), but one or more intermediaries transferred, directly or 6indirectly, more than $10,000 of traceable funds to the 7covered entity during the election cycle, then the 8intermediaries' transfers shall be treated as original funds 9for purposes of the disclaimer required by this section. 10    (10 ILCS 5/9-22)  (from Ch. 46, par. 9-22)11    Sec. 9-22. (a) Any party to a Board hearing, any person who 12files a complaint on which a hearing was denied or not acted 13upon within the time specified in Section 9-21 of this Act, and 14any party adversely affected by a judgment of the Board may 15obtain judicial review, which shall be governed by the 16provisions of the Administrative Review Law, as amended, and 17all amendments and modifications thereof and the rules adopted 18pursuant thereto, except that--19    (1) such judicial review shall be afforded directly in the 20Appellate Court for the District in which the cause of action 21arose and not in the Circuit Court,22    (2) such judicial review shall be obtained by filing a 23petition for review within 7 days after entry of the order of 24other action complained of,25    (3) the time limit for filing such petition for review may   HB5154- 42 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1be waived with the consent of all parties involved, and2    (4) if such petition for review is appealing an order of 3the Board, the effect of such order of the Board shall not be 4stayed unless the Appellate Court so orders upon the motion of 5the petitioner and upon prior notice to the Board.6    (b) In reviewing the Board's dismissal of or failure to 7act upon a complaint, the court shall review de novo whether 8the Board's dismissal or failure to act was reasonable. The 9court shall disregard any claim or defense by the Board of 10prosecutorial discretion as a basis for dismissing or failing 11to act upon the complaint. 12(Source: P.A. 82-783.) 13    (10 ILCS 5/9-28.5)14    Sec. 9-28.5. Injunctive relief for election spending 15electioneering communications.16    (a) Whenever the Attorney General, or a State's Attorney 17with jurisdiction over any portion of the relevant electorate, 18believes that any person, as defined in Section 9-1.6, is 19conducting election spending making, producing, publishing, 20republishing, or broadcasting an electioneering communication 21paid for by any person, as defined in Section 9-1.6, who has 22not first complied with the registration and disclosure 23requirements of this Article, he or she may bring an action in 24the name of the People of the State of Illinois or, in the case 25of a State's Attorney, the People of the County, against such   HB5154- 43 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1person or persons to restrain by preliminary or permanent 2injunction the conducting of election spending making, 3producing, publishing, republishing, or broadcasting of such 4electioneering communication until the registration and 5disclosure requirements have been met.6    (b) Any political committee that believes any person, as 7defined in Section 9-1.6, is conducting election spending 8making, producing, publishing, republishing, or broadcasting 9an electioneering communication paid for by any person, as 10defined in Section 9-1.6, who has not first complied with the 11registration and disclosure requirements of this Article may 12bring an action in the circuit court against such person or 13persons to restrain by preliminary or permanent injunction the 14conducting of election spending making, producing, publishing, 15republishing, or broadcasting of such electioneering 16communication until the registration and disclosure 17requirements have been met.18    (c) Whenever the Attorney General, or a State's Attorney 19with jurisdiction over any portion of the relevant electorate, 20believes that any person, as defined in Section 9-1.6, is 21engaging in independent expenditures, as defined in this 22Article, who has not first complied with the registration and 23disclosure requirements of this Article, he or she may bring 24an action in the name of the People of the State of Illinois 25or, in the case of a State's Attorney, the People of the 26County, against such person or persons to restrain by   HB5154- 44 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1preliminary or permanent injunction the making of such 2expenditures until the registration and disclosure 3requirements have been met.4    (d) Any political committee that believes any person, as 5defined in Section 9-1.6, is engaging in independent 6expenditures, as defined in this Article, who has not first 7complied with the registration and disclosure requirements of 8this Article may bring an action in the circuit court against 9such person or persons to restrain by preliminary or permanent 10injunction the making of independent expenditures until the 11registration and disclosure requirements have been met. 12(Source: P.A. 96-832, eff. 7-1-10; 97-766, eff. 7-6-12.) 13    (10 ILCS 5/9-55 new)14    Sec. 9-55. Prohibition on structured contributions. No 15person shall, for the purpose of evading the reporting 16requirements of this Article or any rule adopted under this 17Article, structure or assist in structuring, or attempt to 18structure or assist in structuring, any solicitation, 19contribution, expenditure, disbursement, or other transaction. 20The penalty for any violation of this Section shall be a 21penalty of not less than the amount contributed or spent, and 22not more than the greater of double that amount or $10,000. 23    (10 ILCS 5/9-8.6 rep.)24    Section 10. The Election Code is amended by repealing   HB5154- 45 -LRB104 18217 SPS 31656 b1Section 9-8.6.